Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
CHAPTER 9 Special Policemen

Cross references.

Special officers for protection of railroad property, §

46-8-230

et seq.

35-9-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term “appointing authority” means the Governor of this state or any officer or agency to whom the power to appoint and deputize special policemen is delegated.

35-9-2.
Appointment of special policemen upon application of Governor or subdivision of another state.

Upon the application of the governor of any state or subdivision thereof owning or having an interest in any property situated wholly or partly in this state, the Governor of this state, or any officer or agency to whom or which he may delegate his powers and duties under this chapter, may appoint and deputize as special policemen, with the powers and duties provided for in Code Section 35-9-9, such number of persons designated in the application as may be deemed necessary for the additional protection of such property.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 595, § 1.

Cross references.

Emergency powers of Governor, §§

38-3-22

,

38-3-51

, 45-12-29 et seq.

35-9-3.
Form and content of application for appointment.

Applications under Code Section 35-9-2 shall be made in writing upon forms prescribed by the appointing authority and shall contain the name, age, nationality, and address of each person for whom an appointment as special policeman is sought and such other information concerning the person as the appointing authority may require.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 595, § 2.

35-9-4.
Qualifications for appointment.

No person shall be appointed a special policeman under Code Sections 35-9-2 and 35-9-3, this Code section, and Code Sections 35-9-5 through 35-9-12 unless he is a citizen of the United States, is a person of good moral character, and has not previously been convicted of a felony.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 595, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 35.

35-9-5.
Issuance of certificate of appointment; effect of certificate.

The appointing authority shall issue a certificate of appointment to each person appointed as a special policeman under Code Sections 35-9-2 through 35-9-4, this Code section, and Code Sections 35-9-6 through 35-9-14 in such form as it may prescribe.

The certificate of appointment shall constitute the appointee’s authority for exercising the powers and carrying out the duties conferred and imposed upon him by Code Sections 35-9-2 through 35-9-4, this Code section, and Code Sections 35-9-6 through 35-9-12.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 595, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 35.

35-9-6.
Oath of office.

Each person appointed under Code Sections 35-9-2 through 35-9-5, this Code section, and Code Sections 35-9-7 through 35-9-12 shall, within 15 days after his certificate of appointment has been issued and before entering upon the duties of his office, take and subscribe the oath prescribed by Code Section 45-3-1 and file it in the office of the appointing authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 595, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 35.

35-9-7.
Compensation.

The compensation of a special policeman shall be fixed in such amount as may be agreed upon between him and the state, political subdivision, department, agency, or district requesting his employment; and the latter shall be liable for the payment thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 595, § 6.

35-9-8.
Status as employee of state.

Each person appointed as a special policeman under Code Sections 35-9-2 through 35-9-7, this Code section, and Code Sections 35-9-9 through 35-9-12 shall for all purposes be deemed to be an employee of the state, political subdivision, department, agency, or district requesting his appointment.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 595, § 6; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 35.

35-9-9.
Powers and duties generally; wearing of special badge; reporting of change of address.

Each person appointed as a special policeman under Code Sections 35-9-2 through 35-9-8, this Code section, and Code Sections 35-9-10 through 35-9-12 shall:

Be charged with the duty of protecting and preserving the property described in the application for his appointment;

Have power to arrest all persons trespassing or committing offenses or crimes on the property described in the application for his appointment;

Have and may exercise the powers of a peace officer, but only upon the property or in connection with the property described in the application for his appointment; and

Have power to possess and carry such firearms and other weapons while on duty as may be prescribed by the appointing authority.

When on duty, a special policeman shall wear a metallic badge upon which shall be inscribed the words “special policeman.”

Whenever a person appointed as a special policeman shall change his residence, he shall forthwith give notice of his new address to the appointing authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 595, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 35.

35-9-10.
Special policemen subject to rules and regulations of appointing authority.

Every special policeman appointed under Code Sections 35-9-2 through 35-9-9, this Code section, and Code Sections 35-9-11 and 35-9-12 shall at all times be subject to the rules and regulations of the appointing authority and to the supervision and control of such person or persons as the Governor of this state may from time to time designate.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 595, § 9; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 35.

35-9-11.
Termination and revocation of appointment.

The appointment of any special policeman under Code Sections 35-9-2 through 35-9-10, this Code section, and Code Section 35-9-12 shall terminate and his authority thereunder shall cease whenever the governor of the state requesting his appointment shall file a notice in the office of the appointing authority, in such form as the latter may prescribe, to the effect that his services are no longer required.

The appointing authority shall also have power, on its own motion at any time and for any reason or cause deemed sufficient by the appointing authority, to revoke the appointment of any special policeman by filing a revocation thereof in its office and mailing a notice of such filing to the governor of the state requesting his appointment and also to the person whose appointment is revoked at his address as it appears in the application for appointment or the latest statement thereof on file.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 595, § 8; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 35.

35-9-12.
Immunity of state from liability for acts or omissions.

Neither this state nor any political subdivision of this state nor any department, officer, board, bureau, or other agency of either the state or any political subdivision thereof shall be liable or accountable in any way for or on account of the appointment of any special policeman or for or on account of any act or omission on the part of any special policeman in connection with his powers and duties under Code Sections 35-9-2 through 35-9-11 and this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 595, § 7; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 35.

35-9-13.
Governor authorized to apply to other states for appointment of special policemen; liability for compensation; effect of proceedings upon provision of normal police protection by other state.

The Governor of this state is authorized, in his discretion, to make application to the governor of any other state for the appointment of special policemen for the additional protection of any property situated wholly or partly in such other state, which property is owned by this state or any subdivision thereof or in which this state or any subdivision thereof has any interest.

This state or the subdivision thereof owning or having an interest in the property for the protection of which any such special policeman is appointed shall be liable for the compensation and expenses of such policeman and shall have full power and authority to provide or otherwise arrange for the payment of such compensation and expenses.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to relieve the state or the political subdivision thereof in which such property is wholly or partly located from providing such normal police protection as it ordinarily and customarily provides for other property situated therein.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 595, § 10.

35-9-14.
Exercise of powers by person knowing of revocation of appointment; effect of filing and mailing of notice of revocation of appointment.

Any person knowing of the revocation of his appointment as a special policeman or having in any manner received notice thereof who exercises or attempts to exercise any of the powers of a special policeman under Code Sections 35-9-2 through 35-9-12 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. The filing and mailing of the notice of revocation of the appointment as provided in Code Section 35-9-11 shall be presumptive evidence that the person whose appointment was revoked knew of the revocation.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 595, § 8.

35-9-15.
Appointment of law enforcement officer of United States or any state as officer of this state.

On request of the sheriff or the chief or director of a law enforcement agency of this state or of any political subdivision thereof, and with the consent of the employee concerned, a law enforcement officer of the United States or any of the several states may be appointed as a law enforcement officer of this state for the purpose of providing mutual assistance in the enforcement of the laws of this state or of the United States. A law enforcement officer who is appointed pursuant to this Code section shall be considered a law enforcement officer of the appointing agency and shall have the same powers, duties, privileges, and immunities as a law enforcement officer employed by the appointing agency.

Any such appointment shall be in writing, signed by the sheriff or the chief or director of the appointing agency, and shall specify the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the employee so appointed. Such appointment shall be at the pleasure of the sheriff or the chief or director of the appointing law enforcement agency. The appointment shall terminate if the person appointed ceases to be employed by an agency of the United States or of the several states. A copy of the appointment shall be filed in the executive office of the appointing agency.

In lieu of any other oath prescribed by the laws of this state, a law enforcement officer appointed pursuant to this Code section shall take an oath to support and defend the Constitution of this state and to execute well and faithfully the laws of this state during the term of such appointment.

As used in this Code section, the term “law enforcement agency” includes, but is not limited to, any sheriff ’s office, municipal police department, county police department, prosecuting attorney’s office, or any agency of the state or a political subdivision of this state whose employees are authorized to enforce the laws of this state.

The following laws shall not apply to law enforcement officers appointed pursuant to this Code section:

Code Section 45-2-1, relating to persons ineligible to hold civil office; and

Chapter 8 of this title, known as the “Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 1089, § 1; Code 1981, §

35-9-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1089, § 4; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 35/HB 942.